Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201421-2,154
Amendment by board of directors.

(MBCA 10.05) Unless the
articles of incorporation provide otherwise, a corporation's board of directors
may adopt amendments to the corporation's articles of incorporation without
shareholder approval:

(1) To extend the duration
of the corporation if it was incorporated at a time when limited duration
was required by law;

(2)
To delete the names and addresses of the initial directors;

(3) To delete the name
and address of the initial registered agent or registered office, if a statement
of change is on file with the Secretary of State;

(4) If the corporation has only
one class of shares outstanding:

(i) To change each issued and unissued authorized
share of the class into a greater number of whole shares of that class; or

(ii) To increase the
number of authorized shares of the class to the extent necessary to permit
the issuance of shares as a share dividend;

(5) To change the corporate name by substituting the
word corporation, incorporated, company, limited, or the abbreviation corp.,
inc., co., or ltd., for a similar word or abbreviation in the name or by adding,
deleting, or changing a geographical attribution for the name;

(6) To reflect a reduction
in authorized shares, as a result of the operation of subsection (b) of section
21-251, when the corporation has acquired its own shares and the articles
of incorporation prohibit the reissue of the acquired shares;

(7) To delete a class
of shares from the articles of incorporation, as a result of the operation
of subsection (b) of section 20-251, when there are no remaining shares of
the class because the corporation has acquired all shares of the class and
the articles of incorporation prohibit the reissue of the acquired shares;
or

(8)
To make any change expressly permitted by subsection (a) or (b) of section
21-238 to be made without shareholder approval.

Laws 2014, LB749, § 154.
January 1, 2016